Wisconsin, session 2025, SB637.
do enact as follows:SB637,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB637,2,8371.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 4(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), (5h), 5(5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a 6partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 7that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 8under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB637,29Section 2. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB637,2,111071.07 (12) Nuclear energy facility credit. (a) Definitions. In this 11subsection:SB637,2,13121. “Claimant” means a person that files a claim under this subsection and 13that is one of the following:SB637,2,1414a. An electric public utility, as defined in 196.192 (1) (a).SB637,2,1515b. An electric cooperative organized under ch. 185.SB637,2,1616c. A municipal electric company, as defined in 66.0825 (3) (d).SB637,2,1717d. A qualified wholesale electric company, as defined in s. 76.28 (1) (gm).SB637,3,612. “Full-time job” means a regular, nonseasonal full-time position in which an 2individual, as a condition of employment, is required to work at least 2,080 hours 3per year, including paid leave and holidays, and for which the individual receives 4pay that is equal to at least 150 percent of the federal minimum wage and benefits 5that are not required by federal or state law. “Full-time job” does not include initial 6training before an employment position begins.SB637,3,773. “Nuclear energy facility” has the meaning given in s. 238.401 (1).SB637,3,108(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, a 9claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the 10amount of the tax, an amount equal to the following:SB637,3,12111. The wages paid by the claimant in the taxable year to the employees who 12work full-time jobs at the claimant’s nuclear energy facility in this state.SB637,3,17132. The capital expenditures paid by the claimant in the taxable year for the 14the construction, improvement, renovation, repair, maintenance, development, or 15operation of the claimant’s nuclear energy facility in this state, including 16expenditures paid to contractors and subcontractors, but not including 17expenditures for acquiring land.SB637,4,218(c) Limitations. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option 19corporations may not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, 20and the amount of, the credit are based on the amounts paid by their nuclear 21energy facilities under par. (b) 1. and 2. A partnership, limited liability company, or 22tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of credit that each of its partners, 23members, or shareholders may claim and shall provide that information to each of 1them. Partners, members of limited liability companies, and shareholders of tax-2option corporations may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.SB637,4,43(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 4s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credits under this subsection.SB637,4,125(e) Transfer. Any person may sell or otherwise transfer the credit under par. 6(b), in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the taxes imposed under 7s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43 if the person notifies the department of the transfer and 8submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents and the department 9certifies ownership of the credit with each transfer. The transferee may first use 10the credit to offset tax in the taxable year of the transferor in which the transfer 11occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in which the credit 12is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the original claimant.SB637,313Section 3. 71.10 (4) (fo) of the statutes is created to read:SB637,4,141471.10 (4) (fo) Nuclear energy facility credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB637,415Section 4. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 16is amended to read:SB637,4,201771.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 1871.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 19(5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and passed through 20to partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB637,521Section 5. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2215, is amended to read:SB637,5,42371.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 24(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), 1(5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 2liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 3partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 4s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB637,65Section 6. 71.28 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB637,5,7671.28 (12) Nuclear energy facility credit. (a) Definitions. In this 7subsection:SB637,5,981. “Claimant” means a person that files a claim under this subsection and 9that is one of the following:SB637,5,1010a. An electric public utility, as defined in 196.192 (1) (a).SB637,5,1111b. An electric cooperative organized under ch. 185.SB637,5,1212c. A municipal electric company, as defined in 66.0825 (3) (d).SB637,5,1313d. A qualified wholesale electric company, as defined in s. 76.28 (1) (gm).SB637,5,19142. “Full-time job” means a regular, nonseasonal full-time position in which an 15individual, as a condition of employment, is required to work at least 2,080 hours 16per year, including paid leave and holidays, and for which the individual receives 17pay that is equal to at least 150 percent of the federal minimum wage and benefits 18that are not required by federal or state law. “Full-time job” does not include initial 19training before an employment position begins.SB637,5,20203. “Nuclear energy facility” has the meaning given in s. 238.401 (1).SB637,5,2321(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, a 22claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the 23amount of the tax, an amount equal to the following:SB637,6,211. The wages paid by the claimant in the taxable year to the employees who 2work full-time jobs at the claimant’s nuclear energy facility in this state.SB637,6,732. The capital expenditures paid by the claimant in the taxable year for the 4the construction, improvement, renovation, repair, maintenance, development, or 5operation of the claimant’s nuclear energy facility in this state, including 6expenditures paid to contractors and subcontractors, but not including 7expenditures for acquiring land.SB637,6,158(c) Limitations. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option 9corporations may not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, 10and the amount of, the credit are based on the amounts paid by their nuclear 11energy facilities under par. (b) 1. and 2. A partnership, limited liability company, or 12tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of credit that each of its partners, 13members, or shareholders may claim and shall provide that information to each of 14them. Partners, members of limited liability companies, and shareholders of tax-15option corporations may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.SB637,6,1716(d) Administration. Subsection (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 17sub. (4), applies to the credits under this subsection.SB637,7,218(e) Transfer. Any person may sell or otherwise transfer the credit under par. 19(b), in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the taxes imposed under 20s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43 if the person notifies the department of the transfer and 21submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents and the department 22certifies ownership of the credit with each transfer. The transferee may first use 23the credit to offset tax in the taxable year of the transferor in which the transfer 1occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in which the credit 2is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the original claimant.SB637,73Section 7. 71.30 (3) (do) of the statutes is created to read:SB637,7,4471.30 (3) (do) Nuclear energy facility credit under s. 71.28 (12).SB637,85Section 8. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 615, is amended to read:SB637,7,10771.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 8corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 9(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) 10and passed through to shareholders.SB637,911Section 9. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1215, is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb637 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb637 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB637 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB637 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB637: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting